Washington statutes.
RCW 3.54.010

Compensation.

The clerk and deputy clerks of district courts shall receive such compensation as shall be provided by the county legislative authority.

[ 1984 c 258 s 34; 1971 c 73 s 6; 1961 c 299 s 98.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.